Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 2 Milk Sanitation Code

21-2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as “The Rhode Island Milk Sanitation Code”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 189, § 1.

21-2-2.
Declaration of policy.

Milk is recognized to be one of the most perfect foods afforded by nature. It is unique in that its consumption in adequate quantities is essential to the nutritional well-being of the individual; but if its production and distribution are not properly safeguarded, it may be instrumental in the transmission of diseases infectious to people. It is declared to be the policy of the state that, for the protection of the health and welfare of the people of the state of Rhode Island, the environmental conditions surrounding the production, handling, transportation, distribution, and sale of milk and milk products shall be to protect the public health and to provide consumers with products that are identified in such a way as to promote honesty and fair dealing in the best interests of the consumers. Specifically, it is declared to be the policy of the state to provide:

That the people of Rhode Island shall have a supply of milk adequate to their needs and demands under all conditions.

That milk provided for consumers within the state of Rhode Island shall be of good quality; shall be safe for human consumption; shall contain no live bacteria capable of transmitting disease to people; shall contain adequate nutritional components; and shall be free of adulteration.

That milk sold or produced in Rhode Island shall come from healthy cows or goats.

That milk sold or produced in Rhode Island shall be produced on farms having standards and conditions of sanitation adequate to ensure production of milk that is safe and of good quality.

That milk sold or produced in Rhode Island shall be produced, processed, and handled by personnel free from any communicable disease.

That milk to be consumed in the state of Rhode Island shall, at all stages in its travel from animal to ultimate consumer, be transported in equipment and/or packages that shall be designed, filled, operated, maintained, and emptied to prevent the introduction and/or propagation of bacteria, dirt, or any other foreign substances.

That all milk sold in Rhode Island shall be handled and processed under conditions of good sanitation and shall be finally packaged free from contamination, dirt, or any other foreign substances and/or adulteration.

That all milk sold within the state of Rhode Island shall be, except as specifically authorized by this chapter, pasteurized by a recognized method of pasteurizing adequate to destroy bacteria capable of transmitting disease to people. Provided, that a physician may authorize an individual sale of goat milk directly from producer to consumer by written, signed prescription.

That the branding or labeling of packages in which all milk sold in the state of Rhode Island shall be delivered to the consumer shall state the grade of milk packaged; may state any special attributes of the milk; and that all statements made on any packaging labels shall not be false or misleading.

That this state shall cooperate in the preparation and promulgation of any set of standards, regulations, statutes, or other means of control of sanitation in the production, transportation, handling, processing, and distribution of milk, or any one or more of them, according to a uniform system of requirements to be adopted alike by all or a majority of the states that contribute milk to the Rhode Island market.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 205, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 536, § 1.

21-2-3.
Definitions.

“Cream” means the liquid milk product high in fat from milk, which may have been adjusted by adding to it: milk, concentrated milk, dry whole milk, skim milk, or nonfat dry milk.

“Director” means the director of the department of health, unless otherwise specified.

“Goat milk” is the lacteal secretion, practically free from colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of healthy goats. The word “milk” is interpreted to include goat milk.

“Grade A” means milk, cream, and products of milk and cream, that comply with the applicable provisions of regulations established by the director.

“Milk” means the lacteal secretion, practically free from colostrum, obtained by complete milking of one or more healthy cows. Milk that is in final package form for beverage use shall contain not less than eight and one-fourth percent (8.25%) milk solids not fat and not less than three and one-fourth percent (3.25%) milk fat. Milk may have been adjusted by separating part of the milk fat from it or by adding cream, concentrated milk, dry whole milk, skim milk, concentrated skim milk, or nonfat dry milk to it. The milk may be homogenized.

“Raw milk for pasteurization” means grade “A” milk for pasteurization and raw products of milk that comply with the sanitary standards for their production, transportation, receiving, handling, storage, processing, distribution, and sale as established by the director.

“Raw milk cheese” means any cheese manufactured from raw milk that meets United States food and drug administration (USFDA) standards for cheeses set forth in 21 C.F.R. 133 and has not undergone the process of pasteurization and that contains, as appropriate for the cheese, generally recognized as safe (GRAS) and suitable ingredients as defined in 21 C.F.R. 184.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 205, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 536, § 1.

21-2-4.
Repealed.

21-2-5.
Analysis of raw milk by private milk laboratories.

Each milk plant engaged in processing milk shall, at least once in each calendar month, either through its own agents or through its milk haulers, collect, preserve, and submit to a private milk laboratory for analysis a sample or samples of the milk of each producer supplying milk to the milk plant. The laboratory shall determine the bacterial counts of the sample, both as raw milk and after pasteurization in the laboratory, the determination to be made by the standard plate count method, as well as a determination for any harmful substances that the director may by regulation require, and shall keep a record of these findings for a period of not less than one year following the findings which shall be open to inspection by the director or any milk inspector. The laboratory shall make a report to the milk plant submitting the sample with respect to each determination.

The director may by regulation require any milk plant to submit samples of milk after pasteurization in the plant to a private laboratory for analysis for the purpose of ascertaining bacterial counts or the presence of harmful substances or organisms as the director may require, and the laboratory shall make its reports on its analysis available to the director in the same manner as with respect to samples of raw milk submitted by producers.

Regulations promulgated by the director pursuant to this section requiring sampling by a private milk laboratory shall not impose an unreasonable burden on milk plants. The director may in his or her discretion engage private laboratories to perform any additional tests that he or she may require in the event the expense of the tests constitutes an unreasonable burden on milk plants. The director may by regulation require producers of raw milk cheese to submit samples of unpasteurized milk for said analysis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 285, § 1.

21-2-6.
Grade A dairy farm permit holders.

All grade A dairy farms shall be inspected at least two (2) times each year by the department of health. If the grade A dairy farm is located outside of the state, the department may accept the inspection of some person or agency outside of the state of Rhode Island who has been qualified and approved by the director to make the inspection.

Every grade A dairy farm permit holder shall be equipped with a bulk storage and pickup tank with suitable and adequate cooling equipment, and no grade A raw milk for pasteurization from grade A dairy farms shall be picked up in cans.

No milk sold or shipped by a grade A dairy farm permit holder as grade A raw milk for pasteurization shall be commingled in any manner with milk or milk products of any other grade if it is to be sold as grade A pasteurized milk.

The director of health shall be responsible for the enforcement of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 205, § 3.

21-2-7.
Permits.

It shall be unlawful for any milk producer whose dairy farm is located wholly or partly in this state to sell or to offer to sell milk or milk products or to have milk stored for sale who does not possess at all times a Rhode Island producer’s permit from the director.

It shall be unlawful for any milk hauler to transport any milk or milk products to any milk plant in the state of Rhode Island or to transport any milk in this state destined for sale in this state unless he or she shall at all times possess a Rhode Island milk hauler’s permit from the director.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a milk plant in the state of Rhode Island who does not possess a Rhode Island milk plant permit from the director with respect to each plant located in Rhode Island.

It shall be unlawful for any milk distributor to sell or offer to sell milk or milk products, including raw milk cheese, within the state of Rhode Island unless he or she shall at all times possess a milk distributor’s permit from the director.

It shall be unlawful for any milk hauler to transport any milk or milk products from any point outside the state into the state of Rhode Island for sale or processing in this state or for any milk plant located in Rhode Island to process any milk or milk products which come from any point outside the state of Rhode Island or for any milk distributor to sell any milk or milk products within this state which come from any point outside this state, unless:

Every producer who produces any part of the milk or milk products shall have been inspected and shall from time to time be inspected with the same minimum frequency, to the same degree, and according to the same requirements as provided in this chapter or any regulations promulgated under this chapter in the case of Rhode Island producers;

Every vehicle in which the milk is transported to the plant where processed shall from time to time be inspected with the same minimum frequency, to the same degree, and according to the same requirements as provided in this chapter or any regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter in the case of Rhode Island milk hauler permittees; and

The operator of each milk plant located outside the state of Rhode Island where any part of the milk is processed at all times possesses an out-of-state milk plant permit from the director.

It shall be unlawful for any person located in the state of Rhode Island to sell or offer for sale to any milk hauler or milk plant, or for any milk plant to pasteurize any raw milk for pasteurization, any part of which shall be used for grade A pasteurized milk or for any grade A milk product, unless the person at all times is in possession of a Rhode Island grade A producer’s permit.

The fees for the following permits referred to in this section shall be as set forth in §

23-1-54

:

In-state milk processors;

Out-of-state milk processors; and

Milk distributors.

Milk producers and milk haulers shall be exempt from permit fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, §§ 1, 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, §§ 1, 10; G.L. 1956, §§

21-2-1

,

21-2-12

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-7

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 36; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 29.

21-2-7.1.
Rhode Island raw milk cheese.

It shall be lawful to produce in this state for sale raw milk cheese, as defined in §

21-2-3

, provided that for the facility for making of such raw milk cheese, an in-state processors permit is obtained pursuant to §

21-2-7

. The fee for such permit shall be in accordance with the provisions of §

23-1-54

for permits issued pursuant to §

21-2-7(g)(1)

, and the facility where the cheese is made shall comply with applicable standards, administered by the director, for a food business, that are reasonable and appropriate for a facility of this type and nature.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 536, § 2.

21-2-8.
Issuance of permits.

General Requirements. The director shall issue a permit as required in §

21-2-7

of any type or kind only after receipt by him or her of a written application upon a form furnished by the director and setting forth any information concerning the applicant and his or her operation and facilities that the director may by regulation require. No permit shall be issued except on the basis of an inspection of the applicant’s operation and facilities by a milk inspector of the department of health, if the applicant’s place of business or operation is located in the state of Rhode Island, or if located outside the state, upon the basis of an inspection by a milk inspector of the department or by some person or agency outside of the state of Rhode Island but qualified and approved by the director to make inspections of the type required in the state where the applicant’s operation or facilities are located. The permit shall issue only after the foregoing conditions and those special conditions, if any, as may be required in the case of any particular type of permit provided in this chapter, shall have been complied with. Every permit shall be granted upon the express condition that the applicant shall at all times conduct his or her operations and maintain his or her facilities in accordance with: (1) the requirements of this chapter, (2) all regulations of the director promulgated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and (3) the terms of §

21-4.1-6

.

Rhode Island milk producer’s permit. A milk producer’s permit shall issue only after the director shall have ascertained that, according to the records of the department, the applicant is currently complying with the provisions of chapters 4 — 7 of title 4.

Distributor’s permit. No distributor’s permit shall be required in the case of retail stores purchasing milk finally bottled or packaged from a permittee under this statute for resale at retail to the ultimate consumer within the state of Rhode Island, but it shall be unlawful for any distributor to sell milk or have milk in his or her possession to sell which has not been processed by a person holding a permit from the director.

Out-of-state milk plant permit. An out-of-state milk plant permit shall be issued by the director only after he or she has received from the applicant for a milk plant permit a statement in writing in an approved form that the applicant agrees, as a condition precedent to the issuance of the permit, that his or her milk plant may be inspected at any time by the director or by milk inspectors of the state of Rhode Island and/or by any other inspectors approved by the director under the provisions of this chapter to make inspections in the state where the milk plant may be located, and that the director and his or her designated agents and representatives may at all reasonable times have access to the books and records of the milk plant for the purpose of enforcing compliance on the part of the applicant with the provisions of this chapter.

Out-of-state milk plants shall meet the provisions of the regulations established by the director to sell, continue to sell, or offer for sale grade A milk or milk products in the state of Rhode Island. The regulations shall be consistent with the Federal Pasteurized Milk Ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, §§ 2, 3, 5, 10; P.L. 1932, ch. 1865, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2035, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2036, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2355, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1937, ch. 2534, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, §§ 2 to 4, 9; G.L. 1956, §§

21-2-2

to

21-2-4

,

21-2-6

,

21-2-11

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-8

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 205, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 2.

21-2-9.
Duration and renewal of permits.

All permits issued by the director shall, unless renewed, expire at midnight of the last day of the twelfth month after the date of issue.

All permits may, except in the case of any permit revoked for cause after a hearing, as provided in this chapter, be renewable by the director upon the filing at least twenty (20) days before the expiration of the permit with the director of an application for renewal giving any information that the director shall, by written regulation, reasonably require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 5; P.L. 1936, ch. 2355, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2534, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 901, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-6

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 189, § 1.

21-2-10.
Issuance of temporary permits.

In any case where a milk plant located outside of the state of Rhode Island shall make application in the first instance for a permit, the director may, in his or her absolute discretion, after taking any measures that he or she shall deem necessary to investigate the health of the animals furnishing milk to the plant, their facilities, and the facilities of the plant and/or the quality of milk of the applicant, as the circumstances shall require, issue a temporary permit which shall permit the milk plant to sell or process milk, as the case may be, for ultimate sale in the state of Rhode Island. No temporary permit shall extend for a period in excess of thirty (30) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-11.
Emergency powers.

In the event of any serious disaster, such as conflagration, enemy attack, earthquake, flood, hurricane, tornado, drought, or other emergency, which shall result in an unusual nonseasonal shortage in the milk supply in the state of Rhode Island, the director shall have power, upon issuance of an order by him or her specifying the nature and extent of the emergency and without notice: (1) to suspend part or all of the regulations made under authority of this chapter; (2) to promulgate other or additional emergency regulations; and (3) to suspend part or all of the requirements of this chapter pertaining to inspection and the obtaining of permits by milk plants located outside the state of Rhode Island from which milk is derived for sale in the state of Rhode Island and pertaining to inspection of their milk producers and haulers.

In the case of any special emergency, the director may issue emergency permits for the importation of milk into the state of Rhode Island which has not been inspected at the source in accordance with this statute and the regulations pursuant to this chapter; provided, that the director shall be satisfied that any source of milk admitted by emergency permit shall not constitute a threat to the health of the people of Rhode Island, and provided that environmental conditions surrounding the production, transportation, and processing of the imported milk shall reasonably have been subject to inspection at its source under authority of law other than that of the state of Rhode Island.

The suspension and emergency regulations shall be for the duration of the emergency or forty (40) days, whichever period shall be shorter.

The director is empowered in the event of any contamination or threat of contamination of the milk supply alone to promulgate additional emergency regulations pertaining to the treatment and conditions of production, distribution, and sale of milk, the regulations to go into effect immediately without a hearing. The emergency regulations shall be in effect forty (40) days or the duration of the emergency, whichever period shall be shorter. The director shall promulgate the emergency regulations by filing a copy of the regulations in the secretary of state’s office and having copies available for public inspection. As soon as practicable, the director shall give notice of the promulgation of the emergency regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, §§ 2, 13; P.L. 1932, ch. 1865, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1933, ch. 2037, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, §§ 2, 12; P.L. 1941, ch. 1043, § 5; G.L. 1956, §§

21-2-4

,

21-2-14

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 36; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 45.

21-2-12.
Revocation of permits.

In the event that any permittee shall be deemed by the director to have violated any of the provisions of this chapter, or of the regulations promulgated under this chapter, or of the terms of §

21-4.1-6

, he or she may, in his or her discretion, initiate proceedings for the revocation of the permit of the permittee. The director shall give the permittee twenty (20) days’ written notice of a hearing at which the permittee shall be given opportunity to show cause as to why his or her permit shall not be revoked. The director may, at the hearing, have the assistance of counsel in ruling upon evidence and in connection with the conduct of the hearing, or, in the alternative, the hearing may be conducted by a subordinate designated by the director for that purpose, who shall take a written record of the proceedings by a competent court stenographer, and the director may decide the issues arising at the hearing upon the basis of the written record. Any decision on the revocation of any permit shall be made by the director in writing by filing his or her written decision containing his or her findings of fact and conclusions in his or her office and serving a copy by registered or certified mail of his or her decision in the matter on the permittee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 7; P.L. 1936, ch. 2355, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-8

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 2.

21-2-13.
Appeals.

An appeal from any decision or order of the director may be taken by any aggrieved party to the superior court in the manner provided for in chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 2.

21-2-14.
Temporary permit suspension.

Temporary permit suspensions shall take place in accordance with procedures set forth in the Grade “A” Pasteurized Milk Ordinance 1978 recommendations of the U.S. Public Health Serviceood and Drug Administration, and subsequent revisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 205, § 2.

21-2-15.
Repealed.

21-2-16.
Embargo of sale or distribution of milk.

In the event that any milk inspector or the director shall at any time, upon inspection of any dairy farm of any Rhode Island milk producer or of the facilities or equipment of any hauler or of any milk processing plant or of the plant, store, or other premises of any distributor, or upon the examination, inspection, or analysis of any quantity of milk or milk product, or in the event that he or she shall receive a report of any unsatisfactory inspection as to the animals of any producer, become satisfied or has probable cause to believe that any supply or quantity of milk is adulterated or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent within the meaning of chapter 31 of this title, he or she may embargo the supply or quantity of milk in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

21-31-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12, P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3.

21-2-17, 21-2-18.
Repealed.

21-2-19.
Inspections and inspectors.

The operations and facilities of all permittees located in the state of Rhode Island shall be inspected by the director or a milk inspector subordinate to the director at least twice each year. The operations and facilities of all permittees located outside the state of Rhode Island shall likewise be inspected by the director or a milk inspector subordinate to the director at least twice a year; provided, that in the event that the director shall be satisfied that the entire inspection service of another state shall be adequate and reliable to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter on the part of producers, milk haulers, or permittees in another state, or in the event that he or she shall be satisfied as to the reliability of any one or more individual inspectors located in another state to ensure compliance, he or she may certify the service or the inspectors, as the case may be, to make the inspections of the operations and facilities of out-of-state permittees located in another state required under this section and required as a condition precedent to the issuance of permits in the first instance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-20.
Special inspections.

In the event that any operator of a milk plant or distributor shall desire to obtain milk to be sold in the state of Rhode Island from any location outside the state, and inspectors for that location have not been certified or approved by the director, and it shall be necessary in order to make the milk conform to the requirements of this statute and the regulations promulgated to provide specially for the necessary inspections pertaining to it, the director may in the alternative either: (1) approve and certify an inspector specially for the purpose; or (2) send an inspector from the director’s own department for the purposes of making the inspections. In either event the milk haulers, the operator of milk plants, or distributors, as the case may be, requesting the inspection and the issuance of any permits involved, shall pay to the director all of the reasonable expenses and the salary pro rata of the inspectors not only of the inspection in the first instance incident to the issuance of permits, but for all subsequent inspections required by the director in the premises, the expenses to be allocated proportionately, according to volume, among the permittees requesting the inspections, if more than one.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-21.
Inspectors and assistants.

The director shall employ any inspectors and assistants in enforcing the provisions of this chapter as he or she shall deem necessary and may delegate to them any powers possessed by him or her under the provisions of this chapter except those conferred upon him or her by §§

21-2-11

,

21-2-23

, and

21-2-29

and which he or she is not in those sections specifically authorized to delegate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-15

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-21

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-22.
Inspection of animals and milk.

Responsibility for the inspection of herds and animals of milk producers within the state of Rhode Island shall be imposed upon the director of environmental management who shall enforce compliance on the part of Rhode Island producers with the provisions of, and as provided in chapters 4, 5, 6, and 7 of title 4. With respect to the herds of producers of milk sold or destined for sale in the state of Rhode Island whose herds or establishments are located outside the state, it shall be the duty of the director of environmental management, either personally or through the director’s subordinates or veterinarians or technicians approved by the director, to make inspection of the herds and animals, wherever located, to assure himself or herself that they comply in all respects with the same requirements pertaining to the herds and animals of Rhode Island producers under the provisions of chapters 4, 5, 6, and 7 of title 4, or in the event that the director is satisfied as to the competence and reliability of an entire inspection service or of individual inspectors of cattle available in the state where the herds or establishments of the out-of-state producers are located, he or she may approve the service or the inspectors, as the case may be, and solicit and accept the certification of those inspectors to the health of the herds and animals of out-of-state producers furnishing milk to out-of-state milk plant permittees and compliance with the standards provided for Rhode Island producers; provided, that in the case of any producer outside of the state of Rhode Island who desires certification for the production of grade A milk, all inspections for animal disease and compliance with the provisions of chapters 4, 5, 6, and 7 of title 4, and for compliance with the requirements for grade A producers provided in §

21-2-6(b)

— (d), shall be made by the director of health himself or herself, his or her own subordinates, or by veterinarians or technicians approved by him or her. It shall be the duty of the director of health to procure any necessary information with respect to the herds of producers located outside the state of Rhode Island, milk from which is processed or sold in Rhode Island, required to ensure that the herds substantially comply with the same requirements as in the case of Rhode Island producers imposed upon them by the provisions of chapters 4, 5, 6, and 7 of title 4.

The director of the department of environmental management shall provide all information and reports necessary to the director of department of health for the enforcement of chapter 6.1 of title 4 and this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 6.

21-2-23.
Director empowered to make regulations.

The director of health is authorized to promulgate any regulations that are necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter, which shall include, but not be limited to, providing for: (1) standards of identity, labeling requirements, maintaining standards for milk and milk products sold or offered for sale in final package forms; (2) standards for the production, transportation, receiving, handling, storage, processing, distributions, and sale of raw milk for pasteurization and products of raw milk, including all pertinent sanitary standards and uniform minimum requirement for inspection of dairy farms, milk plants and receiving stations; and may in like manner amend, modify or repeal those rules and regulations which shall be consistent with the provisions of the Grade “A” Pasteurized Milk Ordinance 1978 recommendations of the U.S. Public Health Service/Food and Drug Administration, 1983 Revisions, which shall become upon the passage of this act the rules and regulations under this chapter in accordance with §

21-2-2(10)

.

The adoption and amendment of regulations in the future shall be in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42; provided, that amendments to the Grade “A” Pasteurized Milk Ordinance adopted by the interstate milk shippers conference shall become a part of the regulations under this chapter. Provided, that a person adversely affected by any regulation may, within thirty (30) days, file with the director, in writing, those objections to a regulation automatically adopted which stays the effect of the regulation. If no substantial objections are received and no hearing is requested within thirty (30) days after publication of a notice of the adoption of a regulation, it shall be effective as of the date it was adopted by the interstate milk shippers conference. When automatic adoption is stayed by a timely objection, the director, after notice, shall conduct a public hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42. The director of health is authorized to adopt any other regulations for milk and other related products that he or she deems necessary in accordance with authority granted under this chapter, chapters 27 and 31 of this title and §

23-1-18(5)

.

The director shall publish a notice of the adoption in a newspaper having general circulation throughout the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 2.

21-2-24 — 21-2-28.
Repealed.

21-2-29.
Standards to be maintained.

All milk and milk products as defined in this chapter which are to be shipped, brought, carried, or transported into Rhode Island for sale, distribution, use, or processing in this state, shall come from animals that are of a substantially equal or higher health status as applied to brucellosis, tuberculosis, or other diseases as those animals located within Rhode Island from which milk is produced for sale, distribution, use, or processing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-30.
Information to be furnished to director.

Every person engaged in the business of producing, handling, transporting, processing, packaging, selling, or distributing milk in Rhode Island shall upon request furnish the director, whenever requested by the director, the following information: (1) full name and place of business; (2) number of quarts of milk handled weekly by him or her or it; and (3) the names and addresses of all producers, milk haulers or milk plants supplying milk to him or her. Every milk plant holding a Rhode Island milk plant permit shall report coincidentally with and by means of a copy of any report which he or she makes, or is required to make, to the federal milk marketing administrator whenever he or she shall have added or dropped a milk producer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-9

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-30

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-31.
Labeling of containers of milk and milk products.

All containers in or from which milk or milk products are sold or offered for sale shall bear a label in accordance with regulations adopted under this chapter.

All labels or marks shall be displayed in the manner and include any matters as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the director; provided, nothing contained in this section shall be construed to empower the director to disapprove of or to change any dealer from using the common name of his or her firm, or of any registered trademark, brand, or trade name customarily used by him or her in the identification of any or all of his or her products.

Samples of all labels or marks to be used on containers of milk or milk products shall be submitted for approval as to color, size of lettering, and matter. No misleading mark or words shall be placed on any container of milk or milk products. The cap or cover of all containers of milk or milk products must cover the pouring lip to at least its largest diameter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 203, § 23; P.L. 1926, ch. 820, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 23; P.L. 1954, ch. 3311, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-16; P.L. 1959, ch. 184, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-31

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 91, § 4; P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 3.

21-2-32.
Labeling as to breed of cows.

The labels of milk containers may carry in addition to one of the above grade names, but set apart from those grade names, the name of the breed of cows producing the milk or the registered trade name or trademark for the breed; provided containers so labeled contain only milk produced from the breed named.

The label of milk product containers may carry in addition to one of the terms defined in §

21-2-31

which correctly describes the contents, but set apart from that term, the name of the breed of cows producing the milk from which the milk product was derived, or the registered trade name or trademark for the breed; provided that containers so labeled contain only a milk product derived from milk produced from the breed named.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 22, P.L. 1954, ch. 3311, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-17; P.L. 1959, ch. 181, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-32

, as enacted by P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 91, § 5.

21-2-33 — 21-2-42.
Repealed.

21-2-43.
Enforcement of chapter.

The director is authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 158, § 1.

21-2-44.
State statutory provisions and rules paramount to local.

Whenever there is any provision of this chapter or any other statute defining a particular kind, type, or grade of milk or milk product or setting forth requirements as to the chemical or bacteriological components, standards, or requirements for that kind, type, or grade of milk or milk product, or specifying standards or methods for the processing, treatment, or packaging or labeling of the milk or milk product, or when the director shall have lawfully established a definition or requirements by regulation, the provisions of that chapter, statute, or regulation shall supersede any definition or requirements for it which may be contained in any city or town ordinance or in the regulations of any city or town office or department, whether made under a statute or an ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-16

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-44

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 35.

21-2-45.
Standardization permitted.

Milk may be standardized by the addition to it of milk, skimmed milk, or cream. The standardized milk shall meet the specifications set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-46.
Wholesale and contract sales.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the sale of milk, cream, skim milk, or milk products to any milk plant, either at wholesale or pursuant to contract, by weight and test and/or upon the basis of milk fat content and/or on the basis of bacterial counts or other sanitation requirements; provided, that in the case of milk or milk products of a particular description or grade, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a sale of any milk or milk product which does not at least conform to the requirements of that description or grade.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 39, P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 38; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-26; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-46

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-47 — 21-2-50.
Repealed.

21-2-51.
Access of enforcement officers.

The director and the director’s duly authorized milk inspectors, deputies, and assistants, or any of them, shall have access, at all reasonable hours, to all premises and places where milk or milk products are produced, handled, or processed or where the process of pasteurization is carried on, for the purpose of the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-7

; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-51

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-52.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sum appropriated, or so much of it as may be required, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1777, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 217, § 16; G.L. 1956, § 21-2-18; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-52

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.